src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-aandam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āndam: # Noun 159 'eng /est hommik/fin' - full paradigm
     āndam+N+Sg+Nom: āndam
     āndam+N+Sg+Gen: āndam
     āndam+N+Sg+Par: āndamt
     āndam+N+Sg+Dat: āndamõn
     āndam+N+Sg+Ins: āndamõks
     āndam+N+Sg+Ill: āndamõ
     āndam+N+Sg+Ela: āndamst
     āndam+N+Pl+Nom: āndamõd
     āndam+N+Pl+Gen: āndamõd
     āndam+N+Pl+Par: āndamidi
     āndam+N+Pl+Dat: āndamõdõn
     āndam+N+Pl+Ins: āndamõdõks
     āndam+N+Pl+Ill: āndamiž
     āndam+N+Pl+Ela: āndamist
